Wyoming, session 2025, HB0234.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-14-405 is created to read:

HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
9-14-405. Criminal actions.

Any person who knowingly violates W.S. 9-14-403(a) is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not
more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two
thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

Section 2. W.S. 9-14-402(a)(iv), (vi), by creating
new paragraphs (xi) through (xvi) and renumbering paragraph
(xi) as (xvii), 9-14-403(a), (b) and by creating a new
subsection (d), 9-14-404(a), (b) and by creating new
subsections (d) and (e) are amended to read:

9-14-402. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(iv) "Financial record" means a financial record
held by a merchant servicer related to a payment card
transaction that the merchant servicer has processed or
facilitated, including any information derived from the
financial record;

HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
(vi) "Firearms retailer" means any person
engaged in the lawful business of selling or trading
firearms, firearms accessories or components or ammunition
to be used in firearms;

(xi) "Ammunition" means ammunition or cartridge
cases, primers, bullets or propellant powder designed for
use in any firearm;

(xii) "Antique firearm" means as defined by W.S.
6-8-403(a)(viii);

(xiii) "Firearm" means any weapon that will, is
designed to or may readily be converted to expel a
projectile by the action of an explosive. "Firearm" shall
include an antique firearm;

(xiv) "Firearm accessory or component" means:

(A) A device specifically designed or
adapted to enable a person to wear or carry a firearm on
the person or to store or mount a firearm in or on a
conveyance;
HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498

(B) An attachment or device that is
specifically designed or adapted to be inserted into or
affixed onto a firearm to enable, alter or improve the
functioning or capabilities of the firearm;

(C) An item that is used in conjunction
with or mounted upon a firearm but are not essential to the
basic function of the firearm, including but not limited to
telescopic or laser sights, magazines, flash or sound
suppressors, folding or aftermarket stocks and grips,
speedloaders, braces, ammunition carriers and lights for
target illumination;

(D) A component for making ammunition,
reloading materials and equipment, machinery and tools for
manufacturing ammunition.

(xv) "Merchant" means a person that accepts
payment cards from customers for the purchase of goods or
services. The terms includes a firearms retailer that
accepts payment cards from customers for the lawful
HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
purchase of firearms, firearm accessories or components or
ammunition to be used in firearms;

(xvi) "Payment card" means a credit card, charge
card, debit card or any other card that is issued to an
authorized card user and that allows the user to purchase
goods or services from a firearm retailer or other
merchant;

(xi)(xvii) "This act" means W.S. 9-14-401
through 9-14-404 9-14-405.

9-14-403. Prohibitions on data collection and use.

(a) No state governmental agency or local government,
special district or other political subdivision or
official, agent or employee of the state or other
governmental entity or any other person, public or private,
shall knowingly or willfully keep or cause to be kept any
list, record or registry of privately owned firearms or any
list, record or registry of the owners of those firearms
created or maintained through the use of a firearms code or
any other merchant category code. This subsection shall not
HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
apply to any financial institution that is not a merchant
servicer or to any record maintained in the ordinary course
of business of any financial institution or federal firearm
licensee as required by 18 U.S.C. 922. state and its
political subdivisions are prohibited from using any
personnel or funds appropriated by the legislature or any
other state funds to enforce, administer or cooperate with
any law, executive order, final rule or regulation of the
federal government that willfully keeps or causes to be
kept any list, record or registry of privately owned
firearms or any list, record or registry of the owners of
those firearms created or maintained through the use of a
firearms code or any other merchant category code. This
subsection shall not apply to any record maintained in the
ordinary course of business of any federal firearm licensee
as required by 18 U.S.C. § 922.

(b) No merchant servicer shall require the usage of
or assign:

(i) A firearms code or other merchant category
code to any merchant located in Wyoming;

HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
(ii) A merchant category code to any merchant
located in Wyoming that is a seller of firearms, firearm
accessories or ammunition distinguishes a merchant from a
general merchandise retailer or sporting goods retailer.

(d) No merchant servicer shall discriminate against a
merchant or customer located in Wyoming by declining a
lawful payment card transaction, limiting or declining to
do business with a firearms retailer or customer for a
lawful transaction or charging a higher transaction or
interchange fee to any merchant or customer for a lawful
payment card transaction based solely on the assignment or
nonassignment of a firearms code or any other merchant
category code that distinguishes a merchant from a general
merchandise retailer or a sporting goods retailer, or
otherwise take any action against a merchant or customer
located in Wyoming that is intended to prohibit or suppress
lawful commerce involving firearms, firearm accessories or
components or ammunition.

9-14-404. Civil actions.

HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
(a) The attorney general may shall investigate
alleged violations of this act and, upon finding a
violation, shall provide written notice to any person or
entity, public or private, believed to be in violation of
this act. Upon receipt of written notice from the attorney
general, the person or entity shall have thirty (30) days
to cease the usage of a firearms, firearm accessories or
ammunition merchant code for any Wyoming merchant or any
other merchant category code that distinguishes a Wyoming
merchant from a general merchandise retailer or a sporting
goods retailer, or from any discriminatory practices
identified in W.S. 9-14-403(d).

(b) If the person or entity fails to cease the usage
of a firearms, firearm accessories or ammunition merchant
code for any or other merchant located in Wyoming category
code in violation of this act or from any discriminatory
practices identified in W.S. 9-14-403(d) after the
expiration of thirty (30) days from the receipt of the
written notice by the attorney general's office, the
attorney general may shall pursue an injunction against any
person or entity, public or private, alleged to be in
violation of this act. A court may order an injunction, in
HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
addition to any other relief, as the court may consider
appropriate.

(d) A merchant located in Wyoming whose business was
the subject of an alleged violation of this act or a
customer who completed a transaction with a merchant
located in Wyoming whose business was the subject of an
alleged violation of this act may petition the attorney
general to investigate the alleged violation. If the
attorney general does not commence an action within sixty
(60) days of receiving the petition, the merchant or
customer may file an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to enjoin the person or entity from requiring
a firearms code or other merchant category code in
violation of this act or from any discriminatory practices
identified in W.S. 9-14-403(d). If a court finds that a
violation of this act has occurred and the person fails to
cease the activity constituting the violation, the court
shall order an injunction and attorney fees and costs, in
addition to any other relief as the court may deem
appropriate.

HB0234

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0498
(e) If the person knowingly and willfully fails to
comply within thirty (30) days after being served with the
injunction, the attorney general, upon petition to the
court, shall recover on behalf of the state a civil penalty
not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each
violation of the act committed after the expiration of the
thirty (30) day period. In assessing a civil penalty, the
court shall consider factors resulting from the violation,
including the financial resources of the violator and the
harm or risk of harm to the rights of the injured party
pursuant to the second Amendment of the United States
constitution and article 1, section 24 of the Wyoming
constitution. An order assessing a civil penalty for a
violation of this article shall be stayed pending appeal of
the order.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0234